Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-505
Secretary of State; laws, acts, resolutions, bonds, insurance policies, records; custodian; transfer.

All public acts, laws, and resolutions passed by the Legislature of the state shall be carefully deposited in the office of the Secretary of State, and the secretary is charged with the safekeeping of such office and all laws, acts, resolutions, bonds or equivalent commercial insurance policies, papers, and records which are or shall be deposited therein. Such records may be transferred to the State Archives of the Nebraska State Historical Society or other suitable records storage facility, when authorization is given by the State Records Administrator pursuant to the Records Management Act.

Laws 1877, § 3, p. 195;

R.S.1913, § 5571;

C.S.1922, § 4875;

C.S.1929, § 84-503;

R.S.1943, § 84-505;

Laws 1973, LB 224, § 14;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 51.

Records Management Act, see section 84-1220.

Enrolled bills must be filed with Secretary of State, and, with the journal of the Legislature, are the only competent evidence of due passage of bills. State v. Abbott, 59 Neb. 106, 80 N.W. 499 (1899).